Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-632
Median, defined.

Median shall mean that part of a divided highway, such as a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing section or space, so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic across or within such barrier, section, or space or to divide such highway into two roadways for vehicular travel in opposite directions.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 128.